New York, session 2025-2026, S6269.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 474-a of the judiciary law, as amended by chapter 2 485 of the laws of 1986, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 474-a. Contingent fees for attorneys in claims or actions for 4 medical, dental or podiatric malpractice. 1. For the purpose of this 5 section, the term "contingent fee" shall mean any attorney's fee in any 6 claim or action for medical, dental or podiatric malpractice, whether 7 determined by judgment or settlement, which is dependent in whole or in 8 part upon the success of the prosecution by the attorney of such claim 9 or action, or which is to consist of a percentage of any recovery, or a 10 sum equal to a percentage of any recovery, in such claim or action. 11 2. Notwithstanding any inconsistent judicial rule, a contingent fee in 12 a medical, dental or podiatric malpractice action shall not exceed the 13 amount of compensation provided for in the following schedule: 14 [30] 33.33 percent of the first [$250,000] $500,000 of the sum recov- 15 ered; 16 [25] 30 percent of the next [$250,000] $500,000 of the sum recovered; 17 [20] 25 percent of the next $500,000 of the sum recovered; 18 [15] 20 percent of [the next $250,000] any amount over $1,500,000 of 19 the sum recovered[; 20 10 percent of any amount over $1,250,000 of the sum recovered]. 21 3. Such percentages shall be computed on the net sum recovered after 22 deducting from the amount recovered expenses and disbursements for 23 expert testimony and investigative or other services properly chargeable 24 to the enforcement of the claim or prosecution of the action. In comput- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06051-01-5 S. 6269 2 1 ing the fee, the costs as taxed, including interest upon a judgment, 2 shall be deemed part of the amount recovered. For the following or 3 similar items there shall be no deduction in computing such percentages: 4 liens, assignments or claims in favor of hospitals, for medical care, 5 dental care, podiatric care and treatment by doctors and nurses, or of 6 self-insurers or insurance carriers. 7 4. In the event that claimant's or plaintiff's attorney believes in 8 good faith that they are entitled to greater compensation than the fee 9 schedule set forth in subdivision two of this section[, because of 10 extraordinary circumstances, will not give him adequate compensation,] 11 provides, an application for greater compensation may be made upon affi- 12 davit with written notice and an opportunity to be heard to the claimant 13 or plaintiff and other persons holding liens or assignments on the 14 recovery. Such application shall be made to the justice of the trial 15 part to which the action had been sent for trial; or, if it had not been 16 sent to a part for trial, then to the justice presiding at the trial 17 term calendar part of the court in which the action had been instituted; 18 or, if no action had been instituted, then to the justice presiding at 19 the trial term calendar part of the Supreme Court for the county in the 20 judicial department in which the attorney has an office. Upon such 21 application, the justice, in [his] their discretion[, if extraordinary 22 circumstances are found to be present, and without regard to the claim- 23 ant's or plaintiff's consent,] may fix as reasonable compensation for 24 legal services rendered an amount greater than that specified in the 25 schedule set forth in subdivision two of this section, provided, howev- 26 er, that such greater amount shall not exceed the fee fixed pursuant to 27 the contractual arrangement, if any, between the claimant or plaintiff 28 and the attorney. Factors to be considered by the court in order to 29 grant the application for an enhanced fee shall include whether the 30 performance of the attorney was superior, taking into account the 31 attendant circumstances including the result of the case in light of the 32 nature of the liability and damages issues, and whether the claimant or 33 plaintiff consents; provided that the granting of the application shall 34 not be contingent on such consent, and provided further, that the attor- 35 ney need not submit the number of hours expended. If the application is 36 granted, the justice shall make a written order accordingly, briefly 37 stating the reasons for granting the greater compensation; and a copy of 38 such order shall be served on all persons entitled to receive notice of 39 the application. 40 5. A claimant or plaintiff may waive the percentage limitations of 41 subdivision two of this section if a claimant or plaintiff voluntarily 42 chooses to deviate from the percentage limitations spelled out in the 43 medical malpractice retainer. In no event shall the attorney's fee be 44 greater than 33.33 percent of the amount recovered. 45 6. Any contingent fee in a claim or action for medical, dental or 46 podiatric malpractice brought on behalf of an infant shall continue to 47 be subject to the provisions of section four hundred seventy-four of 48 this chapter. 49 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.